Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature strongly believes in the importance of health and fitness instruction and a well-rounded education as it is one of the primary goals of basic education identified in RCW 28A.150.210.(2) The legislature acknowledges that state law has allowed individual high school students to be excused from participating in physical education for certain reasons and good cause. The legislature further acknowledges that the waiver process from physical education requirements is based on local policy and procedure and can vary widely between school districts. The legislature finds that this variation between school districts leads to confusion for high school students.(3) The legislature intends to require the recognition of school district decisions to waive physical education requirements for high school students.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.050 and 2006 c 263 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All high schools of the state shall emphasize the work of physical education, and carry into effect all physical education requirements established by rule of the superintendent of public instruction((: PROVIDED, That individual))and in accordance with this section.(2) Individual high school students may be excused from participating in physical education otherwise required under this section on account of physical disability, employment, or religious belief, ((or)) because of participation in directed athletics or military science and tactics, or for other good cause.(3) If a school district decides to excuse a high school student from participating in physical education, permitted under subsection (2) of this section, and that student transfers school districts, then other school districts must recognize that decision.(4) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.210.365 and 2007 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:It is the goal of Washington state to ensure that:(1) By 2010, all K-12 districts have school health advisory committees that advise school administration and school board members on policies, environmental changes, and programs needed to support healthy food choice and physical activity and childhood fitness. Districts shall include school nurses or other school personnel as advisory committee members.(2) By 2010, only healthy food and beverages provided by schools during school hours or for school-sponsored activities shall be available on school campuses. Minimum standards for available food and beverages, except food served as part of a United States department of agriculture meal program, are:(a) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total calories shall be from fat. This restriction does not apply to nuts, nut butters, seeds, eggs, fresh or dried fruits, vegetables that have not been deep-fried, legumes, reduced-fat cheese, part-skim cheese, nonfat dairy products, or low-fat dairy products;(b) Not more than ten percent of its total calories shall be from saturated fat. This restriction does not apply to eggs, reduced-fat cheese, part-skim cheese, nonfat dairy products, or low-fat dairy products;(c) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total weight or fifteen grams per food item shall be composed of sugar, including naturally occurring and added sugar. This restriction does not apply to the availability of fresh or dried fruits and vegetables that have not been deep-fried; and(d) The standards for food and beverages in this subsection do not apply to:(i) Low-fat and nonfat flavored milk with up to thirty grams of sugar per serving;(ii) Nonfat or low-fat rice or soy beverages; or(iii) One hundred percent fruit or vegetable juice.(3) By 2010, all students in grades one through eight should have at least one hundred fifty minutes of quality physical education every week.(4) By 2010, all student health and fitness instruction shall be conducted by appropriately certified instructors.(5) ((Beginning with the 2011-2012 school year, any))Any district waiver or exemption policy from physical education requirements for high school students permitted under RCW 28A.230.050 should be based upon meeting both health and fitness curricula concepts as well as alternative means of engaging in physical activity, but should acknowledge students' interest in pursuing their academic interests.--- END ---